Alaska, session 34, SB20.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. AS 14.30.360(a) is amended to read: 06 (a) Each district in the state public school system shall be encouraged to 07 initiate and conduct a program in health education for kindergarten through grade 12. 08 The program should include instruction in physical health and personal safety 09 including alcohol and drug abuse education, [CARDIOPULMONARY 10 RESUSCITATION (CPR),] early cancer prevention and detection, dental health, 11 family health including infant care, environmental health, the identification and 12 prevention of child abuse, child abduction, neglect, sexual abuse, and domestic 13 violence, and appropriate use of health services. 14 * Sec. 2. AS 14.30 is amended by adding a new section to read: 01 Sec. 14.30.363. Cardiopulmonary resuscitation education. The department 02 shall adopt curricula to instruct public school students on hands-only cardiopulmonary 03 resuscitation. The department shall determine which grade levels are required to 04 receive instruction under this section and adopt curricula that is appropriate for each of 05 those grade levels. A person holding a current cardiopulmonary resuscitation 06 instructor certificate, a license or certificate to provide emergency medical services 07 under AS 18.08.082, or a current teacher certificate issued under AS 14.20 may 08 present the curriculum to students. Each public school providing instruction to 09 students in grades for which this curriculum has been adopted shall offer the 10 instruction. The curricula must 11 (1) be based on current national, evidence-based emergency 12 cardiovascular care guidelines for cardiopulmonary resuscitation; 13 (2) incorporate hands-on practice in addition to cognitive learning; 14 (3) include instruction in the appropriate use of an automated external 15 defibrillator, which may be taught using video or other means if in-person instruction 16 is not available. 17 * Sec. 3. This Act takes effect August 25, 2025. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.